New Jersey, session 221, S403.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.      Section 10 of P.L.1997, c.172 (C.56:11-37) is amended to read as follows: 10.    a.  Except as provided in subsections b., c., d. and e. of this section, a consumer reporting agency may impose a reasonable charge on a consumer for: (1)   making a disclosure to the consumer pursuant to section 7 of this act if the request is the [second] fourth or subsequent request in a 12-month period of time and is not made pursuant to subsection b. of this section; the charge for this disclosure shall not exceed $8 and shall be indicated to the consumer before making the disclosure; and (2)   furnishing to a person designated by the consumer pursuant to subsection k. of section 9 of this act a statement, codification, or summary filed or developed under subsection i. or j. of section 9 of this act, after notification of the consumer under subsection f. of section 9 of this act with respect to the reinvestigation; this charge shall not exceed the charge that the agency would impose on each designated recipient for a consumer report and shall be indicated to the consumer before furnishing this information. b.    Each consumer reporting agency that maintains a file on a consumer shall make all disclosures required pursuant to section 7 of this act without charge to the consumer if, not later than 60 days after receipt by the consumer of a notification of an adverse action or notification from a debt collection agency affiliated with the consumer reporting agency stating that the consumer's credit rating may be or has been adversely affected, the consumer makes a request under section 7 of this act. c.     Upon the request of the consumer, a consumer reporting agency shall make all disclosures required pursuant to section 7 of this act [once] three times during any 12-month period without charge to the consumer. d.    A consumer reporting agency shall not impose any charge on a consumer for providing any notification required by this act, including but not limited to, the notification required pursuant to subsection k. of section 9 of this act following deletion of information from a consumer's file pursuant to section 9 of this act, or making any disclosure required by this act, except as authorized by subsection a. of this section. e.     Upon request of the consumer, a consumer reporting agency shall make all disclosures required pursuant to section 7 of this act once during any 12-month period without charge to that consumer if the consumer certifies in writing that the consumer: (1)   is unemployed and intends to apply for employment in the 60-day period beginning on the date on which certification is made; (2)   is a recipient of assistance under the Work First New Jersey Program; (3)   has reason to believe that the file on the consumer at the agency contains inaccurate information due to fraud; or (4)   has been a victim of a violation of  N.J.S.2C:21-1, section 1 of P.L.1983, c.565 (2C:21-2.1) or N.J.S.2C:21-17 and the court has ordered the deletion of those items of information that were the result of the unlawful use of the victim's personal identifying information. (cf: P.L.2003, c.184, s.9) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.